Massachusetts, session 194th, H695.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 47 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
adding the following sentence:-
No participant shall be required to pay a fee to participate in any school organization or
student activity whose primary purpose is: (i) political; (ii) faith-based; (iii) charitable; (iv)
promoting positive mental or physical health, or raising awareness of the importance thereof; (v)
student leadership activities included but not limited to student council or being a class officer;
(vi) opposing, preventing, addressing, or raising awareness of discrimination or racism, sexism,
and other forms of bigotry; (vii) opposing, preventing, addressing, or raising awareness of
bullying; or (viii) any other purpose deemed by the committee to be a social good.
of 1